Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 8. Courts open to all; suits against state.

All courts shall be open and every person for an injury done to person, reputation or property shall have justice administered without sale, denial or delay. Suits may be brought against the state in such manner and in such courts as the legislature may by law direct.

Cross references. —

As to judicial departments generally, see art. 5, §§ 1 to 29, Wyo. Const.

As to civil jurisdiction and procedure of justice of the peace courts, see ch. 21 of title 1.

As to suits by or against the state or political subdivisions, see ch. 35 of title 1.

As to probate courts, see §§

2-2-101

to

2-2-404

.

As to supreme court, see §§

5-2-101

to

5-2-501

.

As to district courts, see §§

5-3-101

to

5-3-504

.

As to municipal courts, see §§

5-6-101

to

5-6-304

.

As to circuit courts, see §§

5-9-101

to

5-9-214

.

As to juvenile courts, see §§

14-6-201

to

14-6-244

.

As to state military courts, see §§

19-12-101

to

19-12-109

and

19-10-108

.

Closure of proceedings constituted harmless error.—

It was erroneous for a trial court to have closed the proceedings to the public in a termination of parental rights case to preserve the confidentiality of Wyoming Department of Family Services records concerning reports and investigations in the neglect proceedings which led to the termination case, as closure was not a remedy narrowly tailored to protecting confidentiality. However, the error was harmless as the parent did not attempt to show that the parent was harmed by the court's closing the trial to the public. LeBlanc v. State (In re ARLeB), 2017 WY 107, 401 P.3d 932,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2017).

Fundamental right. —

The right to access to the courts is a fundamental right pursuant to this section, requiring strict scrutiny analysis. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992).

Standard issued governing opening of pretrial proceedings and their records to public, including representatives of news media. —

See Williams v. Stafford, 589 P.2d 322,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Public access to court proceedings should be limited only in exceptional circumstances,

in order to enhance public trust and confidence in the judicial process, and to insulate the process against attempts to use the courts as tools for persecution. Williams v. Stafford, 589 P.2d 322,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Where the public's access to pretrial proceedings is restrained, the public (which includes the media) has no constitutional right under the first or sixth amendments to the United States constitution or any corollary provisions of the Wyoming constitution to have free access to such preliminary-hearing proceedings or to all information in the possession of the courts, but access to court proceedings should be limited only in exceptional circumstances. State ex rel. Feeney v. District Court, 607 P.2d 1259,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 614 P.2d 710,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1980).

Not absolute right of access. —

The United States supreme court has never held that the first or sixth amendments to the federal constitution create an absolute right to access to all court proceedings or to all information in the possession of the courts. Williams v. Stafford, 589 P.2d 322,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

And determination of closure not open. —

The portion of a pretrial proceeding involved in the determination of closure shall, itself, be closed to the public. Williams v. Stafford, 589 P.2d 322,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Information relevant to doctor's accreditation discoverable. —

Former § 35-2-602 (confidentiality of hospital reports, see now §

35-2-609

) cannot be construed to preclude a plaintiff's access to all information which is relevant to a doctor's accreditation, in a cause of action against a hospital for negligence in the accreditation and maintenance of qualified medical personnel. The privilege protects from discovery the records concerning the internal proceedings of the hospital committee, but does not exempt from discovery materials which the committee reviews in the course of carrying out its function, nor any action which may be taken thereafter by the hospital as may be influenced by the committee decision. In short, privileged data does not include the materials reviewed by the committee, only those documents produced by the committee as notes, reports and findings in the review process. Greenwood v. Wierdsma, 741 P.2d 1079,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1987), limited, Adams v. Walton, 2011 WY 58, 248 P.3d 1167,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2011).

This section in effect prevents suits against the state

unless they are specifically authorized by the legislature. Hamblin v. Arzy, 472 P.2d 933,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1970).

Suit against state requires legislative consent. —

No suit may be maintained against the state until the legislature makes provision for such filing and absent such consent, no suit or claim may be made against the state.
Biscar v. University of Wyoming Bd. of Trustees, 605 P.2d 374,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1980).

Explicit legislative authorization is required before a suit can be maintained against the state. Vigil v. Ruettgers, 887 P.2d 521,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1994); Allen v. Lucero, 925 P.2d 228,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. Oct. 29, 1996), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Test of state liability without state consent. —

The ultimate test of whether a state agency or employee may be made liable to suit without consent of the state must be found in the answer to the question whether the agency or employee was engaged in a governmental function. Where the activity has been undertaken at the direction of the legislature, or involves legislative or judicial discretion, it has been held to be governmental, but where the activity has historically been carried on by a private corporation, or if it generates fees, it is proprietary.
Biscar v. University of Wyoming Bd. of Trustees, 605 P.2d 374,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1980).

Claim otherwise barred by sovereign immunity may be raised as counterclaim. —

A claim which would otherwise be barred by the doctrine of sovereign immunity may be asserted as a counterclaim in a government-initiated lawsuit if it arises out of the transaction or occurrence that is the subject matter of the opposing party's claim and is asserted to reduce or defeat the government's claim.
Ruppenthal v. State, 849 P.2d 1316,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1993).

State has never consented to be sued for tort. —

It is clear from constitutional and statutory provisions that Wyoming has never given its consent that it might be sued for a tort. Price v. State Highway Comm'n, 62 Wyo. 385, 167 P.2d 309,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1946).

A state exercising governmental functions cannot be made to respond in damages for tort and is not liable for the torts of its officers or agents in the discharge of their official duties, unless it has voluntarily assumed such liability and consented to be liable. Chavez v. Laramie, 389 P.2d 23,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1964).

And any change must be effected by the legislature. —

Despite the inequities that immunity from suit may produce, it is well established in this state that any change must be effected by the legislature rather than by the courts. Williams v. Eaton, 443 F.2d 422, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 10184 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1971).

This section did not change the common-law rule that a wrongful death action abates

on the death of the wrongdoer. Mull v. Wienbarg, 66 Wyo. 410, 212 P.2d 380,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1949).

Wrongful death statute not violative. —

The two-year condition precedent of the wrongful death statute, § 1-38-102(d), does not violate the open courts provision contained in this section. Robinson v. Pacificorp, 10 P.3d 1133,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 2000).

Suit against trustees of university as action against state. —

Suit against the trustees of the university to quiet title to land forming part of the land granted to the state for the benefit of a university by Act of Admission, ch. 664, 26 Stat. 222 (1890), § 8, was a suit “against the state,” and not maintainable without consent of the state, the state being holder of the legal title to the land, and the trustees being public agents of the state. Hjorth Royalty Co. v. University of Wyoming, 30 Wyo. 309, 222 P. 9,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1924).

A suit against the University of Wyoming and its trustees for damages for injuries sustained when a child fell from a dormitory window should have named the state of Wyoming and not the university and its trustees, if it is possible to sue the state directly. Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

University of Wyoming enjoys sovereign immunity. —

The University of Wyoming, together with its officers, as they undertake to act in their official capacities, enjoys sovereign immunity since a suit against the university or these officers is a suit against the state. Biscar v. University of Wyoming Bd. of Trustees, 605 P.2d 374,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1980).

Loss of sovereign immunity as to property rights. —

The state loses its sovereign immunity when it places itself in the same class and on the same footing with private individuals in connection with its property rights. Biscar v. University of Wyoming Bd. of Trustees, 605 P.2d 374,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1980).

Constructing and improving of public streets and highways is a governmental function,

in connection with which a municipal corporation cannot be sued for the negligence of its officers or agents. Chavez v. Laramie, 389 P.2d 23,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1964).

Immunity for highway construction and maintenance constitutional. —

Section

1-39-120

, providing immunity from suit for design, construction and maintenance of highways, bears a reasonable relation to the legitimate legislative objectives of conserving public funds and preserving a fair and viable system of compensating persons injured by governmental actions. There is no constitutional infirmity in the statute. White v. State, 784 P.2d 1313,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1989).

Waiver of state immunity as to actions in federal courts. —

Where there is no clear intent in a waiver of immunity statute to subject the state agencies to actions in the federal courts, such suits may not be maintained. Williams v. Eaton, 443 F.2d 422, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 10184 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1971).

Suits for violation of federal rights. —

Where a violation of federal constitutional rights and entitlement to relief under the federal civil rights acts have been established, this section may not immunize state university officials from such and override the federal constitutional principles in view of the supremacy clause. Williams v. Eaton, 443 F.2d 422, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 10184 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1971).

That litigation is costly, does not make it unavailable.

Kerper v. Kerper, 819 P.2d 407,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1991).

Requirement that plaintiff pay sanctions not denial of access. —

In an action to recover for personal injuries sustained in a motor vehicle accident, the plaintiff was not denied access to the courts where (1) a mistrial was declared after the plaintiff's first witness made reference to liability insurance, in violation of an in limine order, and (2) the plaintiff was ordered to pay sanctions prior to a new trial. Terry v. Sweeney, 10 P.3d 554,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 2000).

Wyo. R. Civ. P. 37(b)(2)(C) specifically permitted the court to enter an order staying further proceedings until the order is obeyed, and Rule 37(b) provided that the trial court required the party failing to obey the order or the attorney advising that party or both to pay the reasonable expenses, including attorney's fees, caused by the failure, unless the court found that the failure was substantially justified or that other circumstances made an award of expenses unjust; there was no violation of Wyo. Const. art. I, § 8 when a district court ordered a trial postponed until sanctions are paid, and the action was dismissed solely because of appellants'
failure to comply with appropriate court orders.
White v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2009 WY 90, 210 P.3d 1096,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 2009).

Standards for, and limitations upon, causes of action allowed. —

The fact that the courts are required to be open and to afford justice for injury done does not mean that a party is assured of success in a legal action, or that standards cannot be set for, and limitations cannot be placed upon, causes of action — all in the interest of justice. Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982).

Governmental Claims Act does not violate this section.

Troyer v. Department of Health & Social Servs., Div. of Vocational Rehabilitation, 722 P.2d 158,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 589

(Wyo. 1986).

This section is not self-executing.

Worthington v. State, 598 P.2d 796,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 434

(Wyo. 1979).

This section is not self-executing; no suit can be maintained against the state until the legislature makes provision for such filing. May v. Southeast Wyo. Mental Health Ctr., 866 P.2d 732,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1993).

This section is not self-executing. —

Because immunity under the Wyoming Government Claims Act is an immunity from suit and not merely a defense to liability, it, like qualified immunity, is effectively lost if the case is erroneously permitted to go to trial; therefore, a denial of summary judgment based on a claim of governmental immunity is appealable without the need for a writ of review. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Presentation of claim is condition precedent to maintenance of action. —

The presentation of claim to the proper auditing officer as required by statute is a condition precedent to the right to maintain action thereon. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

A claim against the state highway commission, as a claim against the state, must be presented to state auditor or as directed by law and such presentation is condition to the right to sue the commission even upon contract. Price v. State Highway Comm'n, 62 Wyo. 385, 167 P.2d 309,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1946).

And petition must show that claim was properly filed. —

In an action against the state highway department on a construction contract, the petition was fatally defective where it did not show that claim was timely filed and filed with proper auditing officer. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Cognovit judgment not per se unconstitutional. —

A cognovit judgment is not per se violative of the fourteenth amendment to the constitution of the United States nor art. 1, §§ 6 and 8, Wyo. Const. This is so because a defendant against whom a cognovit judgment is obtained has a remedy under Rule 60(b), W.R.C.P. Gifford v. Casper Neon Sign Co., 639 P.2d 1385,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1982).

Section

1-3-111

violative of section. —

Section

1-3-111

, which prior to its 1981 amendment provided, that no action shall be brought more than 10 years after substantial completion of an improvement to real property against any person performing or furnishing design, planning, supervision, construction or supervision of the construction of the improvement, violated this section, § 34 of this article and art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.Phillips v. ABC Builders, 611 P.2d 821,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 273

(Wyo. 1980).

Statute of limitations constitutional. —

Section

1-3-111

, which sets forth a statute of limitations for actions involving improvements to real property, is constitutional and does not violate the open courts, uniform operation of general law, and special and local laws provisions of the Wyoming constitution. Worden v. Village Homes, 821 P.2d 1291,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1991); Bredthauer v. TSP, 864 P.2d 442,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. Dec. 21, 1993).

Removal of public officer by governor. —

Statute authorizing governor to remove public officer from office did not violate this section. State ex rel. Wyckoff v. Ross, 31 Wyo. 500, 228 P. 636,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1924).

Dismissal with prejudice is not denial of access. —

District court's dismissal, with prejudice, of a passenger's second personal injury complaint did not bar the passenger's access to a court in violation of the Wyoming Constitution's guarantees of access to courts because the passenger failed to comply with the court's discovery orders; the passenger's first complaint was also dismissed for failing to comply with court orders but the dismissal was without prejudice.
Reynolds v. Bonar, 2013 WY 144, 313 P.3d 501,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2013).

Applicability to driver's license suspension proceedings. —

Motorist was not entitled, under statute, to discovery of information concerning equipment used to perform chemical breath analysis, and thus his constitutional rights were not implicated when he did not receive information until day before contested case hearing. Jones v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 991 P.2d 1251,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1999).

Section

12-8-301

was not violative. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

12-8-301

did not infringe upon the fundamental right of access to the courts established by Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 8 or upon any other fundamental interest, including equal protection of the law, by creating a cause of action against persons who illegally sold or served alcohol to people who caused injuries, while not recognizing the same cause of action against persons who legally sold or served alcohol. Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. July 24, 2003).

Section

1-3-107

violative of section. —

Statute of
limitations for minors, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-3-107(a)(ii), violated this section. The court also held that the
exception now contained in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-114

“except for an action arising from error or omission
in the rendering of licensed or certified professional or health
care
services” was constitutionally infirm. Kordus v. Montes, 2014 WY 146, 337 P.3d 1138,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2014).

Quoted

in

Mott v. England, 604 P.2d 560,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 506

(Wyo. 1979); Oyler v. State, 618 P.2d 1042,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1980); Gates v. Richardson, 719 P.2d 193,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 549

(Wyo. 1986); Williams v. Tharp, 2017 WY 8, 388 P.3d 513,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2017).

Stated

in

Denver Buick, Inc. v. Pearson, 465 P.2d 512,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1970); Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987); Weston County Hosp. Joint Powers Bd. v. Westates Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 841,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

State v. Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 313, 33 P. 992,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1892); Eastwood v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 76 Wyo. 247, 301 P.2d 818,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(1956); State v. Rosachi, 549 P.2d 318,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1976); Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988); Lesh v. Allstate Ins. Co., 723 F. Supp. 624, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12514 (D. Wyo. 1989); Martinez v. City of Cheyenne, 791 P.2d 949,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 50

; Meridian Aggregates Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 827 P.2d 375,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1992); Osborn v. Emporium Videos, 848 P.2d 237,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1993); Scott v. School Dist. No. 6, 815 F. Supp. 424, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2899 (D. Wyo. 1993); Harston v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 913 P.2d 870,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Liability Insurance as Affecting Immunity from Suit,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 86.

For article, “Constitutionality of Special Bills for Private Relief,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 261.

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 229 (1972).

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

For case note, “Sovereign Immunity of the State of Wyoming. Oroz v. Board of County Comm'rs, 575 P.2d 1155,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 274

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1979).

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — a Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — Constitutionality of Wyoming's Co-employee Immunity Statute under Article 10, Section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 355 (1983).

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For comment, “An Obstacle Course to Court: A First Look at Wyoming's Medical Review Panel Act,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 489 (1987).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

For article, “Wyoming's New Comparative Fault Statute,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1996).

For article, “Recreational Injuries and Inherent Risks: Wyoming's Recreation Safety Act: An Update,” see XXXIII Land & Water L. Rev. 249 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Governmental liability from operation of zoo, 92 ALR3d 832.

Liability of governmental unit or its officers for injury to innocent occupant of moving vehicle, or for damage to such vehicle, as result of police chase, 4 ALR4th 865.

Liability of telephone company for mistakes in or omissions from its directory, 47 ALR4th 882.

Attorneys' fees: obduracy as basis for state-court award, 49 ALR4th 825.

Exclusion of public from state criminal trial by conducting trial or part thereof at other than regular place or time, 70 ALR4th 632.

Standing of media representatives or organizations to seek review of, or to intervene to oppose, order closing criminal proceedings to public, 74 ALR4th 476.

Right to jury trial in action under state civil rights law, 12 ALR5th 508.

Constitutionality, construction, and application of statutes requiring bond or other security in taxpayers' action, 41 ALR5th 47.

Bringing of patent infringement suit as violation of §§ 1 and 2 of Sherman Act (15 USC §§ 1 , 2),
62 ALR Fed 203.

Private individual's standing to challenge omission or adequacy of environmental impact statement required by § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C) [42 USC § 4332(c)]),
62 ALR Fed 337.

Access to federal courts by foreign state, or national thereof, which United States does not recognize or with which United States has no diplomatic relations, 65 ALR Fed 881.